Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 2 GENERAL PROVISIONS
19-3-210. Foster parents' bill of rights study - task force created - principles to be examined - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:
Entire section added, p. 1246, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 94:
(1) and (4) amended, p. 2682, § 198, effective July 1.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 1249, § 124, effective August 7.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

19-3-210.5. Foster parents' bill of rights.

A foster parent has the right to:

Be treated with dignity, respect, and consideration as a team member who is making important contributions to the objectives of the child welfare system, including the reunification of the foster child or youth with the foster child's or youth's parents
or family members, whenever safely possible;

Promote the reasonable and prudent parent standard for the child or youth and the continuance of positive family patterns and routines to the extent possible without interfering with court-ordered visitation or services required pursuant to section 19-3-208;

Receive training and support from the state department or county department of human or social services to improve the foster parent's skills in providing daily care and meeting the special needs or disability-related needs of a child or youth in the
foster parent's care;

Be informed by the child placement agency and county department of human or social services about how to reach after-hours contacts;

Receive timely financial reimbursement for the foster parent's care of a child or youth;

Take leave from foster parenting by planning ahead with the foster parent's child placement agency or county department of human or social services to ensure that the needs of the child or youth in the foster parent's home are met during the foster parent's
leave if the foster parent's leave will be longer than that allowed through respite;

Assurances with respect to the foster parent's family's health or safety;

Be provided a clear and understandable description of a child placement agency's plan concerning the placement of a child or youth in the foster parent's home;

Request only the information that is necessary to meet the foster child's or youth's physical, mental, emotional, behavioral, or other identified trauma-related needs pursuant to section 19-1-303 (11), including:

Relevant portions of the foster child's or youth's mental health and medical records, subject to any privilege or confidentiality standard recognized or governed by state or federal law;

Relevant portions of the foster child's or youth's educational records, subject to any privilege or confidentiality standard recognized or governed by state or federal law;

Relevant information in the family services plan to ensure the safety, permanency, and well-being of the foster child or youth, including any safety issues that impact the foster parent's ability to parent the foster child or youth;

Relevant information about the circumstances related to the removal of the foster child or youth from the foster child's or youth's home, subject to any privilege or confidentiality standard recognized or governed by state or federal law; and

Relevant information concerning child or youth placement history, including safety concerns and reasons for unplanned placement moves, subject to any privilege or confidentiality standard recognized or governed by state or federal law.

The foster parent shall maintain the confidentiality of any information obtained pursuant to section 19-1-303 (11).

Reasonable notice of any change in a child's or youth's case plan or of plans to terminate the placement of the child or youth with the foster parent and the reasons for the change or termination of placement. The right to reasonable notice does not confer
a right to object to the child's or youth's case plan or plans to terminate the placement.

Upon request, be advised by the county department of human or social services as to the date and time of any court proceeding, the name of the judge or magistrate assigned to the case, and the court's docket number for the foster child or youth in the
foster parent's placement that the case pertains to;

Be notified when a foster child or youth who a foster parent previously cared for reenters the foster care system; except that the consideration is not a legal presumption in favor of the foster parent fostering the child or youth again and must be consistent
with the best interest of the child or youth; and

Have access to the existing grievance process with the appropriate licensing authority and, as part of such process, file a grievance if any of the foster parent's rights have been violated or denied.

Respondent parents are entitled to receive any information or records provided to a foster parent pursuant to this section unless a court orders the information or records restricted due to the health or welfare of the child or youth.

The rights enumerated in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to a foster parent who jeopardizes the safety of a child or youth or a foster parent against whom criminal charges have been filed for child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401,
an unlawful sexual offense, as defined in section 18-3-411, or any felony.

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1231), ch. 151, p. 966, § 1, effective August 10.

19-3-211. Conflict resolution process - rules - definitions.

The state department, in conjunction with the attorney general, shall adopt rules concerning the statewide implementation of a conflict resolution process in each county and city and county pursuant to the provisions of this section. The purpose of such
conflict resolution process is to provide a forum for grievances concerning the conduct of county department personnel in performing their duties pursuant to this article.

A citizen review panel shall be created in each county and city and county. The members of such citizen review panel shall be appointed by the governing body without influence from the state department or the county department, be representative of the
community, have demonstrable personal or professional knowledge and experience with children, and not be employees or agents of the state department or any county department. At least one member of the citizen review panel
in each county and city and county shall be the parent of a minor child at the time of his or her appointment to serve on such panel.

The conflict resolution process shall provide for the resolution of grievances as follows:

Transmittal of all grievances to the county director for internal resolution by the county department within ten working days after receipt of the grievance;

Closure of the grievance and issuance of a written final decision if the county department has resolved the grievance to the complainant's satisfaction;

Referral of the grievance to the citizen review panel upon the request of the complainant if the county department has not resolved the grievance to the complainant's satisfaction;

Review by the citizen review panel of the grievance and the county department's proposed resolution of the grievance within thirty days after receipt of the referral;

Written notification by the citizen review panel to the complainant and the county director of its recommendation concerning the grievance and the basis for its recommendation;

Closure of the grievance and issuance of a written final decision by the county director if the county department agrees with the recommendation of the citizen review panel;

Referral of a grievance to the governing body for review if the county department or the complainant disagrees with the recommendation of the citizen review panel.

The governing body shall submit a written decision containing its recommendation and the basis for its recommendation to the county director and any county department employee who is the subject of a grievance, and the county director shall issue a written
final decision that shall include the county director's plan for implementation of the final decision.

Any recommendations of the citizen review panel and of the governing body shall be limited to actions within the authority of the county director including, but not limited to, recommendations for case reassignment, personnel training, and disciplinary
action concerning a county department employee. If disciplinary action is initiated against a county department employee as a result of recommendations, the employee shall be entitled to the rights, including procedural
rights to appeal, that the employee has through the merit system or other applicable personnel system under which the employee is employed.

A citizen review panel and any governing body shall have access to child abuse or neglect reports and any information from the complete case file that the governing body believes is pertinent to the grievance, which shall be reviewed solely for the purpose
of resolving grievances pursuant to the provisions of this section; except that access to identifying information concerning any person who reported child abuse or neglect shall not be provided and no participant in the
conflict resolution process shall divulge or make public any confidential information contained in a report of child abuse or neglect or in other case file records to which he or she has been provided access.

The county department shall prepare a final report to the citizen review panel within thirty days after the issuance of any final decision in the conflict resolution process that shall include the disposition of each grievance referred to the citizen
review panel in a manner not inconsistent with applicable state and county personnel rules.

The complainant or county department employee who is the subject of the grievance shall receive copies of the following:

The written decision of the governing body required pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (1);

The final written decision of the county director required pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (1);

The final report of the county department required pursuant to paragraph (g) of this subsection (1).

The state department shall create a system for monitoring compliance with this section that shall include annual reports prepared by each county and city and county as to the grievances received and their disposition. Such annual reports shall be made
available to the citizen review panels and the state department and shall be available for public review.

At the request of the complainant, the county department, or the subject of the grievance, each citizen review panel, as part of its review, may take informal testimony submitted voluntarily and without fee by experts or other individuals, including county
department personnel.

Each citizen review panel may request and receive information from any other county or city and county that may be pertinent to the grievance.

Each county department shall implement the conflict resolution process. The state department shall promulgate rules governing the implementation of the process in the following areas:

Procedures for making relevant information concerning the conflict resolution process public;

Time frames for the citizen review panel's and the governing body's written notification of recommendations; and

Procedures for processing grievances, for determining if a grievance is within the scope of the conflict resolution process, and for receiving testimony and other information from the complainant, the county department, and the subject of the grievance.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to direct or authorize any participant in the conflict resolution process to use the process to interfere with any civil or criminal investigation or judicial proceeding, to seek relief from any court action,
or to seek a remedy that is within the authority of a court having jurisdiction over a pending proceeding.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), a county department shall not be precluded from presenting any relevant evidence in a pending civil or criminal investigation or proceeding that the county department has obtained
in the course of fulfilling its duties in the conflict resolution process pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 2081, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 96:
(6) repealed, p. 85, § 11, effective March 20; (2)(h) repealed, p. 1247, § 118, effective August 7.

L. 97:
Entire section R&RE, p. 1434, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(1)(a) and IP(4) amended, p. 194, § 8, effective August 4.

19-3-212. Notice of rights and remedies for families.

The state department shall prepare, with the assistance of the attorney general, on a standardized written form, a detailed informational notice of rights and remedies for families subject to the provisions of this article.

The notice prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be supplied to all social service and law enforcement agencies in the state and shall be delivered to all parents and families from whom children are removed under court order or by
law enforcement personnel, along with a copy of the court order directing removal of the child or children from the home. In addition to the notification on the court order, the informational notice shall contain a statement as
to the cause of the removal of the child or children. The notice shall also contain disclosure of the availability of the conflict resolution process to persons who are the subject of any child abuse or neglect report and to the
parents, Indian custodians, guardian, or legal custodian of a child who is the subject of any child abuse or neglect report. The standardized written notice form prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall also include
a notification of rights of the parents, Indian custodians, guardians, or legal custodians of Indian children under the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq.

The notice prepared pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be available for public inspection at a review and comment hearing prior to its adoption.

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 2081, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 97:
(2) amended, p. 1437, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2002:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 786, § 5, effective May 30.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1) and (2), see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

19-3-213. Placement criteria.

In any case in which the county department recommends placement out of the home for a child or in which a child is in out-of-home placement, the court, the guardian ad litem, the county department, any CASA volunteer, and other parties shall consider
the best interests of the child and shall comply with the following placement criteria:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective until January 9, 2023.] Prior to the change of placement of a child, the county department shall, to the extent possible, notify the guardian ad litem, any CASA volunteer, and other parties.
If the guardian ad litem or other party disagrees with the change of placement, he or she may seek an emergency hearing concerning the appropriate placement for a child. In an emergency, the county department may proceed
to make the change of placement prior to any requested hearing.

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
Prior to the change of placement of a child, the county department shall, to the extent possible, notify the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth, any CASA volunteer, and other parties. If any party
disagrees with the change of placement, the party may seek an emergency hearing concerning the appropriate placement for a child. In an emergency, the county department may proceed to make the change of placement prior
to any requested hearing.

Except in exceptional circumstances, no child shall remain in an emergency, short-term, or shelter facility for more than sixty days, nor shall a child be moved from one such facility to another, unless all reasonable efforts to return the child to the
child's home or to place the child in a more permanent setting have been exhausted.

If the child is part of a sibling group, as defined in section 19-1-103, and the sibling group is being placed in foster care, the county department shall make thorough efforts to locate a joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group.
If the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing, and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it is presumed that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint
placement is in the best interests of the children. The presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests
of a child or of the children.

Consideration of the placement of children together as a sibling group in foster care shall not be construed as requiring the removal of a child from his or her home and placement into foster care if that is not in the best interests of the child.

In any proceeding under this article involving a sibling group, the judge shall review the family services plan document regarding placement of siblings.

Prior to the change of placement of a child, all parties shall attempt to promote educational stability for the child by taking into account the child's existing educational situation and, to the extent possible and in accordance with the child's best
interests, selecting a change of placement that enables the child to remain in the existing educational situation or to transfer to a new educational situation that is comparable to the existing situation.

If a child runs away from an out-of-home placement facility, the person in charge of the placement facility, foster parent, relative, or other placement provider shall notify the county department as soon as possible after discovering that the child has
run away. The county department shall notify the court and other parties within ten days after the county department has received notice and take appropriate steps to locate the child.

Source:

L. 97:
Entire section added, p. 1438, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(1) amended, p. 475, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(1)(c)(I) amended, p. 2622, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2008:
(1)(d) added, p. 471, § 3, effective April 17.

L. 2021:
(1)(c)(I) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 730, § 73, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 441, § 23, effective January 9, 2023.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting subsection (1)(d), see section 1 of chapter 147, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92,
Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-214. Placement reporting.

Each county department shall maintain and update on a monthly basis a report of the number of children who have been removed from their homes and placed in the temporary custody of the county department for the preceding month. The report shall indicate
whether a child who has been placed out of the home has been placed with relatives.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the state department shall submit an annual report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly no later than December 1 of each year that compiles the monthly reports of the number of children who
have been placed out of the home in each county or city and county for the preceding year as required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 97:
Entire section added, p. 1438, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2017:
(2) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 521, § 4, effective August 9.

19-3-215. Foster care - capacity may be exceeded for sibling groups.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules that allow foster care homes to exceed capacity for the number of children and for square footage requirements in order to accommodate the joint placement of sibling groups in a single foster care
home.

Source:

L. 2000:
Entire section added, p. 478, § 9, effective July 1.

19-3-216. Rules.

The state board of human services shall promulgate rules to determine whether there is child abuse or neglect as defined in section 19-1-103 (1)(a)(VII) or if a child is neglected or dependent as described in section 19-3-102 (1)(g).

Source:

L. 2020:
Entire section added, (SB 20-028), ch. 186, p. 854, § 6, effective June 30.

19-3-217. Parent-child visitation upon removal.

At any hearing held pursuant to section 19-3-403 (2) or (3.5), the court shall enter temporary orders for reasonable visitation with the child's parent that is consistent with the age and developmental needs of a child if the court finds that visitation
is in a child's best interests. The court shall order contact between the parent and child, which contact may include but is not limited to telephone, virtual, or in-person visits, commencing within seventy-two hours after any
hearing pursuant to section 19-3-403 (2) or (3.5), excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and any court holiday. The court may authorize an extension of time for contact to commence if the delay is agreed upon by the parent, county department,
and guardian ad litem or if the court finds that a delay in contact is in the child's best interests.

Nothing in this section restricts the court from granting discretionary authority to the department and guardian ad litem to increase opportunities for additional parent-child contacts or sibling contacts without further court order.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until January 9, 2023.] Absent the issuance of an emergency order, a parent granted visitation is entitled to a hearing prior to an ongoing reduction in, suspension of, or increase in the level
of supervision, including a change from in-person visitation to virtual visitation. If the court issues an emergency order suspending, reducing, or restricting visitation, a parent is entitled to a hearing within seventy-two hours
after the order is issued, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays. The court need not hold a hearing if there is agreement by the petitioner, guardian ad litem, and parent to the reduction, suspension, or increase in
level of supervision of visits. Any such agreement must be reduced to writing and filed with the court. Nothing in this section prevents the county department from canceling a visit if the child's health or welfare would be endangered
or if the parent consents to the cancellation of the visit.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
Absent the issuance of an emergency order, a parent granted visitation is entitled to a hearing prior to an ongoing reduction in, suspension of, or increase in the level of supervision, including a change from
in-person visitation to virtual visitation. If the court issues an emergency order suspending, reducing, or restricting visitation, a parent is entitled to a hearing within seventy-two hours after the order is issued, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays. The court need not hold a hearing if there is agreement by the petitioner, guardian ad litem or counsel for youth, and parent to the reduction, suspension, or increase in level of supervision
of visits. Any such agreement must be reduced to writing and filed with the court. Nothing in this section prevents the county department from canceling a visit if the child's health or welfare would be endangered or if the
parent consents to the cancellation of the visit.

Nothing in this section requires or permits a county department to arrange a visit if the visit would violate an existing protection order in any case pending in this state or any other state. The county department is not required to produce a child for
court-ordered visitation if the visitation is made impossible due to the policies of a facility where the parent is incarcerated or in treatment.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section added, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3426, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2022:
(3) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 441, § 24, effective January 9, 2023.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.